District of Columbia statutes.
42-2026

Rule against perpetuities and rule against unreasonable restraints on alienation not applicable to horizontal property regimes; exception for individual units.

The rule of property known as the rule against perpetuities, and the rule of property known as the rule restricting unreasonable restraints on alienation, §§ 42-302 and 42-304 [repealed], shall not be applied to defeat any of the provisions of this subchapter, or of any declaration, bylaws, or other document executed in accordance with this subchapter as to the condominium project. This exemption shall not apply to estates in the individual condominium units.

History

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 460, Pub. L. 88-218, § 26

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1726.
1973 Ed., § 5-926.

Editor's Notes

Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.